Hawaii, session 2026, GM1163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the department of
land and natural resources regularly receives requests for
permits that involve the taking of sand, dead coral or coral
rubble, rocks, soil, or other marine deposits from state waters
for research, education, management, or propagation purposes.
However, existing law does not authorize the department to
approve these permit requests.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to allow for the
taking of sand, dead coral or coral rubble, rocks, soil, or
other marine deposits seaward from the shoreline for research,
education, management, or propagation purposes when authorized
by permits issued by the department of land and natural
resources; provided that the resources will be returned to the
beach if possible and pose no risk to the environment.
SECTION 2. Section 171-58.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2026-3469 HB2395 CDl HMSO

Page 2 2395
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
"§171-58.5 Prohibitions. The mining or taking of sand,
dead coral or coral rubble, rocks, soil, or other marine
deposits seaward from the shoreline [ie] shall be prohibited
with the following exceptions:
(1) The inadvertent taking from seaward of the shoreline
of these materials, such as those inadvertently
carried away on the body, and on clothes, toys,
recreational equipment, and bags;
(2) For the replenishment or protection of public
shoreline areas and adjacent public lands seaward of
the shoreline, or construction or maintenance of state
approved lagoons, harbors, launching ramps, or
navigational channels with a permit authorized under
chapter 183C;
(3) The clearing of these materials from existing drainage
pipes and canals and from the mouths of streams
including clearing for the purposes under section
46-11.5; provided that the sand removed shall be
placed on adjacent areas unless this placement would
result in significant turbidity;
2026-3469 HB2395 CDl HMSO 2

H B NO
C.D. 1
(4) The cleaning of areas seaward of the shoreline for
state or county maintenance purposes including the
purposes under section 46-12; provided that the sand
removed shall be placed on adjacent areas unless the
placement would result in significant turbidity;
(5) The taking of these materials for research, education,
management, or propagation purposes when authorized by
a permit issued by the department; provided that the
resources shall be returned to the beach if possible
and that the taking poses no more than a minimal or
negligible risk to the environment;
(6) The exercise of traditional cultural practices as
authorized by law or as permitted by the department
pursuant to article XII, section 7, of the Hawaii
State Constitution; or
[4^] (7) For the response to a public emergency or a state
or local disaster."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3469 HB2395 CDl HMSO 3

T2
H.B. NO. h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 29th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2395, HD 2, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2395, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
87-26